Hawaii statutes.
§251-5 Remittances. All
remittances of surcharge taxes imposed under this chapter shall be made by
cash, bank draft, cashier's check, money order, or certificate of deposit to
the office of the taxation district to which the return was transmitted. The
department shall deposit the moneys into the state treasury to the credit of
the state highway fund. [L 1991, c 263, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 104, §§4, 8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next